Oklahoma, session 2026, SB274.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 41 O.S. 2021, Section 201, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 201. A. The owner of any real property, including any
improvements consisting of dwelling units, acquired or improved in
connection with an allocation of income tax credits pursuant to the
provisions of Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, or in connection with an allocation of income tax credits
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB274 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

purs uant to the provisions of Section 2357.403 of Title 68 of the
Oklahoma Statutes shall have the right to impose conditions in any
lease agreement for the occupancy of any dwelling located on real
property as described by this section which allow the owner to
accept or decline to enter into the lease agreement, or to terminate
a previously executed lease agreement based upon the discovery of
incomplete or false information, with respect to the prior felony
conviction of any person identified as a tenant pursuant to the
terms of the lease agreement, including occupants of the dwelling
whether or not those occupants formally execute a lease agreement.
B. The owner of real property as described in subsection A of
this section may either accept or decline to enter into a lease
agreement or to terminate a previously executed lease agreement
based upon felony convictions, whether pursuant to federal law or
the laws of any state or other governmental jurisdiction, for the
following types of offenses:
1. Possession of any drug or chemical;
2. Possession of any drug or chemical with intent to
manufacture or distribute;
3. Sex offenses, including, but not limited to, any form of
sexual assault, rape, indecent exposure, or other sexually related
offense if such offense was a felony;
4. Assault or battery or both if the offense was a felony;
5. Any felony involving violence against another person; and
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB274 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

6. Such other felony offenses as the owner of the real property
as described in subsection A of this section includes in the terms
of the lease agreement.
C. The provisions of this section shall supersede the
administrative rule of any state agency, board, commission,
department, statewide beneficiary public trust or other entity of
state government to the extent of any conflict.
D. The provisions of subsections A and B of this section shall
be applicable with respect to lease transactions occurring on or
after the effective date of this act April 29, 2019, without regard
to the construction date of the improvements to real property as
described by subsection A of this section.
E. For awards beginning on or after January 1, 2026, an award
recipient for the income tax credits pursuant to the provisions of
Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or in
connection with income tax credits allocated pursuant to Section
2357.403 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes shall have a clearly
defined criminal history screening policy in a tenant selection plan
that establishes criteria for renting to prospective residents and
shall include, but not be limited to, the following:
1. An individualized review that considers the safety of
residents and property; provided, an applicant with a criminal
conviction may be denied housing only after conducting such review;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB274 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. The amount of time following a conviction during which
criminal records will be considered in determining the approval of a
lease application; and
3. An established procedure for conducting individualized
reviews of applicants with a criminal record which shall include,
but not be limited to, a notification to the applicant that an
individualized review will be conducted and the right of the
applicant to provide supporting documentation and mitigating
evidence for the individualized review.
The screening policy shall not include any statements such as
“Any applicants with criminal convictions will be denied”.
F. An individualized review conducted pursuant to subsection E
of this section shall include consideration of the following
factors:
1. The seriousness of the offense, especially with respect to
the effect of the offense on other residents;
2. The age of the individual at the time the offense was
committed;
3. The length of time since the offense occurred;
4. Evidence of rehabilitation such as employment, job training,
educational achievement, treatment program completion, or letters of
recommendation; and
5. Whether the offense has any connection to how the tenant or
household member would perform as a tenant, resident, or neighbor.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB274 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

G. The Oklahoma Housing Finance Agency shall review the tenant
selection plan to ensure compliance with subsection E of this
section during compliance monitoring review. The Agency shall
provide guidance to owners of real property who receive an award of
affordable housing tax credit as it pertains to creation of policies
and practices to comply with this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON JUDICIARY
February 11, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS
















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB274 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)